Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.155

Temporary certification or licensing—Extension.

(1) A real estate appraiser from another state who is certified or licensed by another state may apply for registration to receive temporary certification or licensing in Washington by paying a fee and filing a notarized application with the department on a form provided by the department.

(2) The director is authorized to adopt by rule the term or duration of the certification and licensing privileges granted under the provisions of this section. Certification or licensing shall not be renewed. However, an applicant may receive an extension of a temporary practice permit to complete an assignment, provided that a written request is received by the department prior to the expiration date, stating the reason for the extension.

(3) A temporary practice permit issued under this section allows an appraiser to perform independent appraisal services required by a contract for appraisal services.

(4) Persons granted temporary certification or licensing privileges under this section shall not advertise or otherwise hold themselves out as being certified or licensed by the state of Washington.

(5) Persons granted temporary certification or licensure are subject to all provisions under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 339 s 13; 2001 c 78 s 1; 1993 c 30 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.